test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-pieaqkhkh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: peâkˈka
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: pieʹǩǩest
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: pieʹǩǩin
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess: pieʹǩǩen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Par: pieʹǩǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [pieʹǩǩtaa, pieʹǩǩtää]
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: pieʹǩǩi
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: pieʹǩǩid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: pieʹǩǩid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: pieʹǩǩin
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: pieʹǩǩivuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [pieʹǩǩitaa, pieʹǩǩitää]
